Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 7
DISABILITY AND SURVIVOR BENEFITS

31-30.5-701. Coverage.

The provisions of this part 7 governing the benefits payable in the event of the death or disability of an active old hire member shall apply with respect to any such member who dies or becomes disabled prior to January 1, 1980. The provisions of this part 7 governing the benefits payable in the event of the death of a retired old hire member shall apply regardless of the date of death.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 882, § 1, effective May 23.

31-30.5-702. Police officers' old hire pension plans - municipalities under one hundred thousand in population.

If an old hire member of any police department in a municipality having a population of less than one hundred thousand, while in the performance of the member's duty or by reason of service in such department, becomes physically or mentally disabled and such disability is deemed to be of a temporary nature, the board of trustees shall retire the individual with a disability and shall authorize the payment to such individual, monthly, of an amount from the pension fund equal to the monthly compensation paid any such member as salary at the date of such disability, not to exceed a period of one year. For the purpose of determining the physical or mental disability of any such member, the board of trustees may personally examine the member or may appoint one or more physicians or surgeons to make an examination of the member and report their findings to the board, which report may be taken into consideration in determining whether the member has a physical or mental disability.

After any old hire member of any police department in a municipality having a population of less than one hundred thousand has been retired temporarily by reason of any disability, the board of trustees has the right at any time to cause such retired member to be brought before it and again examined by competent physicians or surgeons and has the right to examine other witnesses for the purpose of discovering whether such disability yet continues and whether such retired member should be continued on the pension roll, not to exceed a period of one year, or reinstated in the service of the police department, except in case of dismissal or resignation. Such retired member is entitled to notice and to be present at the hearing of any such evidence and may be represented by counsel. The retired member shall be permitted to propound any question pertinent or relevant to such matter and shall also have the right to introduce evidence on the member's own behalf. All witnesses so produced shall be examined under oath, and any member of such board of trustees is authorized to administer such oath to such witnesses. The decision of such board shall be final.

If any old hire member or officer of any police department in a municipality having a population of less than one hundred thousand becomes mentally or physically disabled so as to render necessary the member's retirement from service in such department, said board of trustees shall retire such member from service in such department, and the member shall receive from the pension fund an amount equal to one-half of the monthly salary received by the member at the time the member becomes so disabled. Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, when any old hire member of such police department or retired old hire member dies and leaves a surviving spouse or dependent parent or children under the age of sixteen years, surviving, the board of trustees shall authorize the payment monthly from the pension fund of the sum of thirty dollars to such surviving spouse or dependent parent and six dollars to each such minor child until the child reaches the age of sixteen years. No pension shall be paid to the dependent parent of the deceased member who leaves a surviving spouse, and, if the surviving spouse of any deceased member remarries, such pension shall cease.

In those municipalities making contributions from general funds into the old hire police officers' pension plan pursuant to section 31-30.5-402, the benefits payable in the event an old hire member of such police department or retired member dies and leaves a dependent surviving spouse or dependent parent or children under the age of sixteen years shall be an amount equal to one-fourth the monthly salary received by the member of the department at the time the member died to such surviving spouse or dependent parent and an amount equal to one-eighth of the monthly salary received by the member of the department at the time the member died to each minor child until such child reaches the age of sixteen years. No pension shall be paid to the dependent parent of the deceased member who leaves a surviving spouse, and, if the surviving spouse of any deceased member remarries, such pension shall cease.

If at any time there is not sufficient money or other property in said pension fund to pay to each beneficiary the full amount per month to which such beneficiary is entitled, an equal percentage of such monthly payment shall be made to each, until such fund is so replenished as to warrant payment in full to each of such beneficiaries.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 882, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (SB 14-118), ch. 250, p. 986, § 22, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

Provisions of this section were formerly numbered as §§ 31-30-308 (1) to (3), 31-30-309, and 31-30-321 (1)(c).

31-30.5-703. Firefighters' old hire pension plans - municipalities and districts under one hundred thousand in population.

Any old hire member of a paid fire department in a municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district, having less than one hundred thousand in population who becomes mentally or physically disabled while on active duty during regular assigned hours of duty from any cause not self-inflicted nor due to the habitual use of intoxicants or drugs to an extent whereby the member is unable to perform the member's duties shall be retired by the board. Any old hire member of said fire department who has completed five or more years as a member of said department but who is unable to perform the member's duties by reason of heart disease or any disease of the lungs or respiratory tract shall submit competent evidence substantiating the member's claim that the member has contracted said disease while on duty as a result of strain or the inhalation of noxious fumes, poison, or gases and shall be retired by the board.

In cases where a special position or assignment can or may be assigned to such old hire member, the member may be assigned to such special position or assignment. Any such retirement shall be for the period of the disability and no longer and shall be governed by the provisions of paragraphs (c) to (e) of this subsection (1).

Effective July 1, 1969, said old hire member shall be paid a monthly pension equal to one-half the amount of the member's monthly salary as of the date of the member's retirement plus, if the governing body of the municipality, the board of directors of the fire protection district, or the board of the county improvement district authorizes such additional benefits, one-half of any increase in salary and longevity or additional pay based on length of service granted during the period of the member's retirement to the rank occupied by the member in said department. Said pension shall continue to be paid as long as the member is in retirement.

All applicants for disability pensions shall be examined by one or more physicians selected by the board and may be examined by one or more physicians selected by the applicant. All expenses of examination by the physician chosen by the board shall be paid by the board out of the old hire pension fund.

The board shall establish such rules as it deems proper for the purpose of reexamination of all old hire members who are retired for disability to determine from time to time the fitness of such members to return to active duty in said department. No such member who has reached the age of fifty years, either before or after the member's retirement, shall be reexamined. No such member who has completed twenty years of active duty before the date of such retirement shall be reexamined. No member on the retired list shall be examined sooner than one year after date of retirement and not more often than once a year thereafter. In the event it is found by said board that any member on the retired list has recovered from the disability that caused the member's retirement, such member, if the member is under fifty years of age and has served less than twenty years of active duty, shall be removed from the retired list and ordered to report to the chief officer of said fire department within thirty days for assignment to active duty. During said period of thirty days, such member may file a written protest in which the member shall state any objection to the member's removal from the retired list. The decision of said board shall be suspended pending a hearing on said protest, at which hearing such member shall have the right to appear and to be represented by counsel. During the period that any member is retired for disability by said board, such member, if under the age of fifty years and having served less than twenty years of active duty, shall be carried on a special roll of the fire department and listed as inactive.

Except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (f), if an old hire member of the fire department becomes mentally or physically disabled while not on active duty during regularly assigned hours of duty and from any cause not self-inflicted or due to the habitual use of intoxicants or drugs to an extent whereby the member is unable to perform the member's regular fire department duties, the member shall be paid by the board, starting twelve months from such disability and for the remaining period of such disability, a monthly benefit equal to five percent of the amount set forth in paragraph (c) of this subsection (1), multiplied by the number of years the member has been in active service with said fire department; but any such benefit under this subsection (1) shall not exceed one-half of the member's monthly salary as of the date of the member's disability. The provisions covering examinations, and reexamination as set forth in paragraph (e) of this subsection (1), shall be applicable to all cases arising under this paragraph (f).

Any person who became an old hire member of a fire department prior to July 1, 1971, shall be entitled to the benefits set forth in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (f) as of the date of the onset of such disability and shall not be subject to the twelve-month delay provision.

If any old hire member of a fire department in a municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district having a population of less than one hundred thousand dies from any cause, whether on duty or not or while on the retired list, leaving a surviving spouse or dependent parent, such surviving spouse or dependent parent shall be awarded a monthly annuity equal to one-third of the monthly salary of a first-grade firefighter at the time of the member's death or retirement so long as the surviving spouse or dependent parent remains unmarried. No dissolution of a subsequent marriage shall have the effect of reinstating said surviving spouse on the pension roll or authorizing the granting of a pension. No pension shall be paid to the dependent parent of a deceased old hire member who leaves a surviving spouse or dependent children.

In addition to the annuity set forth in subsection (2) of this section, the board shall also order the payment to such surviving spouse or the legally appointed guardian of each dependent child of such deceased old hire member of said fire department of a monthly annuity of thirty dollars for each child, to continue until such child reaches the age of eighteen years. If such surviving spouse dies or there is no surviving spouse, as limited and described in subsection (2) of this section, but there are surviving children under eighteen years of age, the board shall order a monthly payment equal to the full payment to which a firefighter's surviving spouse is entitled under subsection (2) of this section to be divided equally among the children or a monthly payment of thirty dollars for each child, whichever total amount is greater, to the guardian for said children. In no event shall such surviving children of a deceased or retired firefighter receive an amount in excess of one-half of the current salary paid to a firefighter, first grade, of said department. No annuity shall be paid to the dependent parent of a deceased member who leaves a child or children under eighteen years of age.

When any active or retired old hire member dies, the board shall appropriate from the old hire pension fund the sum of one hundred dollars, as a death benefit, to be paid to the surviving spouse or family of the deceased, but, if there is no surviving spouse or family, said sum shall be paid to such other person as the board of said fund designates.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 884, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

Provisions of this section were formerly numbered as §§ 31-30-407 (1) to (3) and 31-30-409.

31-30.5-704. Police officers' old hire pension plans - municipalities of at least one hundred thousand in population.

If any old hire member of the police department in a municipality having a population of at least one hundred thousand, while in the performance of the member's duty, becomes temporarily totally disabled, physically or mentally, for service by reason of service in such department, the board shall order the payment to such disabled member, monthly during such disability but not to exceed one year, from the old hire pension fund, a sum equal to the monthly compensation allowed such member as salary at the date of the member's disability if such member is paid no salary as such member. If any old hire member of the police department, while in the performance of the member's duty, becomes mentally or physically permanently disabled by reason of service in such department so as to render necessary the member's retirement from service in such department, the board shall retire such disabled member from service in such department. No such retirement on account of disability shall occur unless said member has contracted said disability while in the service of said police department.

Upon retirement the board shall order the payment to such disabled member from the old hire pension fund a sum equal to one-half the monthly compensation allowed to such the member as salary at the date of the member's retirement. If any old hire member of the police department in a municipality having a population of at least one hundred thousand, while in the performance of the member's duty, is killed, dies as a result of an injury received in the line of duty or of any disease contracted by reason of the member's occupation, dies from any cause whatever as the result of the member's services in said department, or dies while in the service or on the retired list from any cause and leaves a surviving spouse or a dependent child under sixteen years surviving or, if unmarried, leaves a dependent parent surviving, the board shall direct the payment from the fund, monthly, to such surviving spouse, while unmarried, of thirty dollars, and for each child, while unmarried, until the child reaches the age of sixteen years, six dollars, and to the dependent parent, if such member was unmarried, thirty dollars. The pension to the dependent parent or both shall be paid as follows: If the father is dead, the mother shall receive the entire thirty dollars, and if the mother is dead, the father shall receive the entire thirty dollars, and if both are living, each shall receive fifteen dollars.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 886, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-608.

31-30.5-705. Firefighters' old hire pension plans - municipalities of at least one hundred thousand in population.

Any old hire member of a fire department in a municipality having a population of at least one hundred thousand, who becomes mentally or physically disabled while on active duty during regularly assigned hours of duty from any cause not self-inflicted nor due to the habitual use of intoxicants or drugs to an extent whereby the member is unable to perform the member's duties shall be retired by the board. Any old hire member of said fire department who has completed five years or more as a member of the department but who is unable to perform the member's duties by reason of heart disease or any disease of the lungs or respiratory tract shall be presumed, unless said presumption is overcome by competent evidence, to have contracted said disease while on active duty as a result of strain or the inhalation of noxious fumes, poison, or gases and shall be retired by the board.

In cases where a special position or assignment can or may be assigned to such member, the member may be assigned to such special position or assignment. Any such retirement shall be for the period of the disability, and no longer, and shall be governed by the provisions of subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section.

The old hire member shall be paid a monthly pension equal to one-half the amount of the member's monthly salary as of the date of the member's retirement plus one-half of any increase in salary and longevity or additional pay based on length of service granted during the period of the member's retirement to the rank occupied by the member in the department. The member, after retirement, shall continue to accrue longevity, and the member's length of service shall continue to extend in the same manner and with the same limitations as if the member were still active and not retired. Said pension shall continue to be paid as long as the member is in retirement.

All applicants for disability pensions shall be examined by one or more physicians selected for the purpose by the board and may be examined by one or more physicians selected by the applicant. All expenses of examination by the physician chosen by the board shall be paid by the board out of said fund.

The board shall establish such general rules as it deems proper for the purpose of reexamination of all old hire members who have been retired for disability to determine from time to time the fitness of such members to return to active duty in the department. No such member who has reached the age of fifty years, either before or after the member's retirement, shall be reexamined. No such member who has completed twenty-five years of active duty in the department before the date of such retirement shall be reexamined. No member on the retired list shall be examined sooner than one year after date of retirement and not more often than once a year thereafter. In the event it is found by the board that any old hire member on the retired list has recovered from the disability that caused the member's retirement, such member, if the member is under fifty years of age and has served less than twenty-five years of active duty, shall be removed from the retired list and ordered to report to the chief officer of the fire department within thirty days for assignment to active duty. During said period of thirty days such member may file a written protest in which the member shall state any objection that the member may have to the member's removal from the retired list. The decision of the board shall be suspended pending a hearing on said protest, at that hearing the member shall have a right to appear and to be represented by counsel. During the period that any member is ordered retired for disability by the board, such member, if under the age of fifty years and having served less than twenty-five years of active duty, shall be carried on a special roll of the fire department and listed as inactive.

In any case where an old hire member of the fire department in a municipality having a population of at least one hundred thousand becomes mentally or physically disabled while not on active duty during regularly assigned hours of duty and from any cause not self-inflicted or due to the habitual use of intoxicants or drugs to an extent whereby the member is unable to perform the member's regular fire department duties, the member shall be paid by the board, during the period of such disability and no longer, a monthly benefit equal to five percent of the amount set forth in subsection (3) of this section multiplied by the number of years the member has been in active service with the fire department; except that any such benefit under this section shall not exceed one-half of the member's monthly salary as of the date of the member's disability. The provisions covering examinations and reexaminations, as set forth in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, shall be applicable to all cases arising under this subsection (6).

If any old hire member of a fire department in a municipality having a population of at least one hundred thousand dies from any cause while in the service or while on the retired list, leaving a surviving spouse, such surviving spouse shall be awarded a monthly annuity equal to one-third of the monthly salary of such member at the time of the member's death or retirement plus one-third of any increase in salary and longevity or additional pay based on length of service granted to firefighters of the rank or comparable successor rank that the member held in the department on the date of the member's death or retirement so long as such surviving spouse remains unmarried. No dissolution of a subsequent marriage shall have the effect of reinstating said spouse on the pension roll or authorizing the granting of a pension. This section shall apply alike to surviving spouses of firefighters and retired firefighters who die after April 11, 1947, and to surviving spouses of firefighters and retired firefighters who were dead on said date, it being the intent of the general assembly to provide an annuity for all surviving spouses of firefighters, which annuity shall increase or decrease proportionately to any increase or decrease in the current rate of pay of firefighters.

The board shall also order the payment to such surviving spouse or the legally appointed guardian of each child of such deceased old hire member of the fire department a monthly annuity of thirty dollars for each child, to continue until such child reaches the age of eighteen years. If such surviving spouse dies or there is no surviving spouse as limited and described but such deceased old hire member leaves surviving children under eighteen years of age, the board shall order a monthly payment equal to the full payment to which a firefighter's surviving spouse is entitled under subsection (7) of this section to be divided equally among the children or a monthly payment of thirty dollars for each child, whichever total amount is greater, to the guardian of the children for the children. In no event shall such surviving children of a deceased or retired firefighter receive an amount in excess of one-half of the current salary paid to a firefighter, first-grade, of said department.

When an active or retired firefighter dies without necessary funeral expenses, the board shall appropriate from the fund a sum not exceeding one hundred dollars to the surviving spouse or family or other person paying the expenses for the purpose of assisting the proper final disposition of the deceased old hire member.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 887, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2021:

(9) amended, (SB 21-006), ch. 123, p. 500, § 29, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

Provisions of this section were formerly numbered as §§ 31-30.5-508 (1) to (6), 31-30-509, 31-30-510, and 31-30-512.